Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-812
Abandoned or neglected pioneer cemetery;
county transfer management; conditions.

A county which is maintaining an abandoned
or neglected pioneer cemetery may transfer the management of the cemetery
to a cemetery association formed under sections 12-501 to 12-532 or to a cemetery
district organized under sections 12-909 to 12-923 if:

(1) The county
has been maintaining the cemetery pursuant to sections 12-807 to 12-810 for
at least five years;

(2) The planning commission appointed pursuant to section 23-114.01,
if any, reviews the proposed transfer; and

(3) The county board approves the transfer
of the cemetery by resolution after a public hearing for which notice is provided
to the public.

Laws 2014, LB863, § 12.